Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2329
Emergency conditions; notification requirements; liability.

Sections 76-2321 and 76-2323 shall not apply to an excavation made under an emergency condition if all reasonable precautions are taken to protect the underground facilities. If an emergency condition exists, the excavator shall give notification in substantial compliance with section 76-2321 as soon as practical. Upon being notified that an emergency condition exists, each operator shall provide all reasonably available location information to the excavator as soon as possible. If the emergency condition has arisen through no fault of the excavator, sections 76-2324 and 76-2325 shall not apply and the excavator shall be liable for damage to any underground facility located in the area if the damage occurs because of the negligent acts or omissions of the excavator.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 29.